Illinois, session 104th, SB2574.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4ARTICLE 15    Section 5. The sum of $244,990,700, or so much thereof as 6may be necessary, is appropriated from the McCormick Place 7Expansion Project Fund to the Metropolitan Pier and Exposition 8Authority for debt service on the Authority's McCormick Place 9Expansion Project Bonds, issued pursuant to the "Metropolitan 10Pier and Exposition Authority Act", as amended, and related 11trustee and legal expenses. 12    Section 10. The sum of $15,000,000, or so much thereof as 13may be necessary, is appropriated to the Metropolitan Pier and 14Exposition Authority from the Metropolitan Pier and Exposition 15Authority Incentive Fund for the authority's corporate 16purposes, including but not limited to incentive grant funds. 17    Section 15. The sum of $18,032,800, or so much thereof as 18may be necessary, is appropriated to the Metropolitan Pier and 19Exposition Authority from the Chicago Travel Industry 20Promotion Fund for a grant to Choose Chicago.   SB2574- 2 -OMB104 00102 HLB 10102 b1    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 22025.